en: Chemicals
xx: Chemicals
cs: Chemikálie
da: Kemikalier
de: Chemikalien
es: Productos químicos
fr: Produits chimiques
it: Prodotti chimici
ja: 化学製品
nl: Chemicaliën
no: Kjemikalier
pl: Chemikalia
pt: Produtos químicos
ru: Химические вещества
sv: Kemikalier
tr: Kimyasallar

en: Acid Neutralizers
xx: Acid Neutralizers
cs: Neutralizátory kyselin
da: Syreneutralisering
de: Säureneutralisierer
es: Neutralizadores de ácido
fr: Neutraliseurs d'acides
it: Neutralizzatori di acidi
ja: 酸中和剤
nl: Zuurneutraliserende stoffen
no: Syrenøytralisatorer
pl: Neutralizatory kwasów
pt: Neutralizadores de ácido
ru: Нейтрализаторы кислот
sv: Syraneutraliserare
tr: Asit Nötralize Ediciler

en: Ammonia
xx: Ammonia
cs: Amoniak
da: Ammoniak
de: Ammonium
es: Amoníaco
fr: Ammoniac
it: Ammoniaca
ja: アンモニア
nl: Ammoniak
no: Ammoniakk
pl: Amoniak
pt: Amônia
ru: Аммиак
sv: Ammoniak
tr: Amonyak

en: Chimney Cleaners
xx: Chimney Cleaners
cs: Čističe komínů
da: Skorstensrensere
de: Kaminreiniger
es: Limpiadores de chimeneas
fr: Produits pour le nettoyage de cheminées
it: Pulizia canne fumarie
ja: 煙突用洗剤
nl: Schoorsteenveegmiddelen
no: Skorsteinsrensere
pl: Środki do czyszczenia kominów
pt: Limpadores de chaminé
ru: Средства для чистки дымоходов
sv: Skorstensrengörare
tr: Baca Temizleyiciler

en: Concrete & Masonry Cleaners
xx: Concrete & Masonry Cleaners
cs: Čističe betonu a zdiva
da: Rensning af beton og murværk
de: Beton- & Mauerreiniger
es: Limpiadores de hormigón y cemento
fr: Produits nettoyants pour béton et maçonnerie
it: Prodotti di pulizia per cemento e murature
ja: コンクリート・レンガ用洗剤
nl: Beton- en steenreinigers
no: Rensing av betong og mur
pl: Środki czyszczące do betonu i kamienia
pt: Limpadores de alvenaria e concreto
ru: Средства для чистки бетона и кладки
sv: Rengöringsmedel för betong och murbruk
tr: Beton ve Duvar Temizleyiciler

en: De-icers
xx: De-icers
cs: Rozmrazovací prostředky
da: Afisere
de: Enteiser
es: Descongelantes
fr: Dégivreurs
it: Prodotti antigelo
ja: 解氷剤
nl: IJsbestrijders
no: Antifrostmidler
pl: Odmrażacze
pt: Removedores de gelo
ru: Антиобледенители
sv: Avisningsmedel
tr: Buz Çözücüler

en: Deck & Fence Cleaners
xx: Deck & Fence Cleaners
cs: Čističe dřevěných teras a oplocení
da: Rensning af terrasse og hegn
de: Holzterrassen- & -zaunreiniger
es: Limpiadores de cercas y terrazas
fr: Produits nettoyants pour terrasses et clôtures
it: Prodotti di pulizia per ponti e recinti
ja: デッキ・フェンス用洗剤
nl: Veranda- en hekwerkreinigers
no: Terrasse- og gjerderensere
pl: Środki czyszczące do tarasów i płotów
pt: Limpadores de decks e cercas
ru: Средства для чистки заборов и настилов
sv: Rengöringsmedel för däck och staket
tr: Döşeme ve Çit Temizleyiciler

en: Drain Cleaners
xx: Drain Cleaners
cs: Čističe odpadů
da: Afløbsrensere
de: Abflussreiniger
es: Limpiadores para desagües
fr: Produits de débouchage
it: Liquidi disgorganti
ja: 排水管用洗剤
nl: Gootsteenontstopper
no: Avløpsrensemidler
pl: Środki do czyszczenia rur
pt: Limpadores de ralos
ru: Средства для чистки канализационных систем
sv: Propplösare
tr: Gider Temizleyiciler

en: Electrical Freeze Sprays
xx: Electrical Freeze Sprays
cs: Nevodivé mrazicí spreje
da: Frysespray til elektronik
de: Kältespray für Elektronik
es: Espráis congelantes para circuitos eléctricos
fr: Sprays réfrigérants pour équipement électrique
it: Spray congelante per uso elettrico
ja: 電子部品用急冷剤
nl: Koelspray voor elektra
no: Frysesprayer til elektrisk utstyr
pl: Spraye schładzające dla elektryków
pt: Sprays de refrigeração elétrica
ru: Спреи для охлаждения электрических компонентов
sv: Kylsprej för elkomponenter
tr: Elektrikli Bileşen Soğutma Spreyleri

en: Lighter Fluid
xx: Lighter Fluid
cs: Náplně do zapalovačů a tekuté podpalovače
da: Lightergas
de: Anzünderflüssigkeit
es: Gas para encendedores
fr: Allume-barbecue liquides
it: Liquido per accendini
ja: ライター用オイル
nl: Aanstekervloeistof
no: Lightervæske
pl: Płyny do zapalniczek
pt: Fluido de isqueiro
ru: Жидкости для розжига
sv: Tändvätskor
tr: Çakmak Gazı

en: Septic Tank & Cesspool Treatments
xx: Septic Tank & Cesspool Treatments
cs: Čističe septiků a žump
da: Rensning af septiktank og sivebrønd
de: Reiniger für Abwassertanks & Senkgruben
es: Limpiadores de fosas sépticas y sumideros
fr: Produits pour le nettoyage de fosses septiques
it: Prodotti di pulizia per fosse settiche e pozzi neri
ja: 浄化槽・汚水槽用洗剤
nl: Septic tank- en beerputreinigers
no: Septiktank- og kloakkrens
pl: Środki czyszczące do szamb
pt: Limpadores de fossa séptica e latrina
ru: Средства для чистки септических резервуаров и выгребных ям
sv: Rengöringsmedel för septiktankar och avloppsbrunnar
tr: Septik Tankı ve Foseptik Çukuru Temizleyiciler

en: Hardware Glue & Adhesives
xx: Hardware Glue & Adhesives
cs: Speciální lepidla
da: Klæbestof og lim til sammenføjning af materialer
de: Kraftklebstoffe & -leime
es: Pegamentos y adhesivos industriales
fr: Colle et adhésifs de construction
it: Adesivi e colle per articoli di ferramenta
ja: 金属用接着剤
nl: Constructielijmen en -kitten
no: Jernvarelim og -klebemidler
pl: Kleje
pt: Adesivos e colas para ferragens
ru: Клеи и адгезивы
sv: Industrilim och fästmedel
tr: Hırdavat Tutkalı ve Yapıştırıcıları

en: Hardware Tape
xx: Hardware Tape
cs: Pásky
da: Arbejdstape
de: Klebebänder
es: Cinta para bricolaje
fr: Bandes et rubans
it: Nastro da pacchi
ja: DIY用テープ
nl: Doe-het-zelf-tape
no: Teip
pl: Taśmy
pt: Fita métrica
ru: Аппаратные ленты
sv: Tejp för järnvaror
tr: Tesisat Bandı

en: Lubricants
xx: Lubricants
cs: Maziva
da: Smøremidler
de: Schmiermittel
es: Lubricantes
fr: Lubrifiants
it: Lubrificanti
ja: 潤滑剤
nl: Smeermiddelen
no: Smøremidler
pl: Smary
pt: Lubrificantes
ru: Смазки
sv: Smörjmedel
tr: Yağlayıcılar

en: Masonry Consumables
xx: Masonry Consumables
cs: Zednický spotřební materiál
da: Forbrugsvarer til murerarbejde
de: Maurermaterial
es: Consumibles para albañilería
fr: Consommables de maçonnerie
it: Materiali di consumo per opere di muratura
ja: 左官用消耗品
nl: Verbruiksartikelen voor metselwerk
no: Utstyr til murerarbeid
pl: Materiały murarskie
pt: Consumíveis para alvenaria
ru: Расходные материалы для каменной кладки
sv: Murningsvaror
tr: Duvarcılık Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Bricks & Concrete Blocks
xx: Bricks & Concrete Blocks
cs: Cihly a betonové tvárnice
da: Mursten\, sten og beton
de: Mauersteine & Betonblöcke
es: Ladrillos y bloques de hormigón
fr: Briques et parpaings
it: Mattoni e calcestruzzo
ja: レンガ・コンクリート
nl: Bakstenen\, stenen en beton
no: Murstein og betong
pl: Cegły\, kamienie\, beton
pt: Tijolos\, pedras e concretos
ru: Кирпичи\, камень и бетон
sv: Tegelsten\, sten och betong
tr: Tuğlalar\, Taşlar ve Beton

en: Cement\, Mortar & Concrete Mixes
xx: Cement\, Mortar & Concrete Mixes
cs: Cementové\, betonové a maltové směsi
da: Cement
de: Zement\, Mörtel & Beton
es: Mezclas de hormigón\, cemento y argamasa
fr: Mélanges de ciment\, mortier et béton
it: Cementi\, malte e miscele di calcestruzzo
ja: セメント
nl: Mortels
no: Sement\, mørtel og betongblandinger
pl: Cementy
pt: Cimentos
ru: Цемент
sv: Cement
tr: Çimento\, Harç ve Beton Karışımları

en: Grout
xx: Grout
cs: Spárovací hmoty
da: Cementmørtel
de: Mörtel
es: Mezcla para juntas
fr: Enduit pour joints
it: Malta liquida
ja: グラウト
nl: Voegspecie
no: Mørtel
pl: Fugi
pt: Argamassa
ru: Жидкий строительный раствор
sv: Murbruk
tr: Derz

en: Painting Consumables
xx: Painting Consumables
cs: Malířský spotřební materiál
da: Forbrugsvarer til malerarbejde
de: Malermaterial
es: Consumibles para pintura
fr: Consommables de peinture
it: Materiali di consumo per la pittura
ja: 塗装用消耗品
nl: Verbruiksartikelen voor schilderwerk
no: Malerutstyr
pl: Materiały malarskie
pt: Consumíveis para pintura
ru: Расходные материалы для покраски
sv: Målarvaror
tr: Boyama Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Paint
xx: Paint
cs: Barvy
da: Maling
de: Farbe
es: Pinturas
fr: Peinture, Déchets de peintures\, vernis\, encres et colles, Déchets de peintures vernis encres et colles produits chimiques
it: Pitture
ja: 塗料
nl: Verf
no: Maling
pl: Farby
pt: Tinta
ru: Краска
sv: Målarfärg
tr: Boya